Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-313
Department of Health and Human Services; trustee for state hospitals for the mentally ill.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall hold in trust, for the state hospitals for the mentally ill, all real or personal property given or bequeathed, to be applied for any purpose connected with the institutions.

G.S.1873, c. 31, § 7, p. 412;

R.S.1913, § 7240;

C.S.1922, § 6897;

C.S.1929, § 83-702;

R.S.1943, § 83-313;

Laws 1947, c. 335, § 5, p. 1057;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 943.